Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1657
Tuition Recovery Cash Fund; claim; statute of limitations.

(1) Any student injured by the termination of operations by a private postsecondary career school on or after September 9, 1993, may submit a claim against the Tuition Recovery Cash Fund. The board shall adopt rules and regulations for the evaluation and approval of claims made against the fund and shall provide for payments made from the fund. No claim shall be allowed unless it is submitted within one year after the school terminates operations and there are sufficient funds available in the fund to pay the claim.

(2) For purposes of this section, a student injured by the termination of operations by a private postsecondary career school means (a) a student who has paid tuition and fees to the school for which classes were not offered and no refunds were made or (b) a student who ceased to be enrolled in classes at a school while the school was in operation and to whom a refund of unearned tuition and fees became due from the school after the school terminated operations and no refunds were made within the required time period following the student's withdrawal from the school under the rules and regulations established by the department.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 55;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2862;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 57;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 53.